Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6309
Waiver of requirements; when authorized.

(1) In the event of an emergency in which, in the opinion of the department, there is created a situation of present and severe danger which poses an immediate threat to the public health, safety, and welfare, the department may waive the requirement for licensure of an individual or business entity upon application and payment of the fee prescribed by the department. Such emergency waiver shall be limited to the time required to take protective measures.

(2) The department may, on a case-by-case basis, approve an alternative to a specific worker protection requirement for an asbestos project if the business entity submits a written description of the alternative procedure and demonstrates to the department's satisfaction that the proposed alternative procedure provides equivalent protection to the health, safety, and welfare of all classes of asbestos occupations and the general public.

(3) If the business entity is not primarily engaged in asbestos projects, the department may waive the requirement for a license upon application and payment of the fee prescribed by the department if worker protection requirements are met or an alternative procedure is approved pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and the health, safety, and welfare of the general public is protected.

Laws 1986, LB 1051, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 1073, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 656;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1249.